packages/spell_kit/test/fixtures/long_flags/index.aff
# SPDX-FileCopyrightText: 2026 Benoit Rolandeau <borlnov.obsessio@gmail.com>
#
# SPDX-License-Identifier: Apache-2.0

# Fixture affix file for spell_kit tests: two-character flags (FLAG long). Covers KEEPCASE,
# FULLSTRIP and CIRCUMFIX.
SET UTF-8
FLAG long
TRY acdefinorstw

KEEPCASE K1
FULLSTRIP
CIRCUMFIX C1

# FULLSTRIP: "an" is built entirely from the append text (its own 2 letters), leaving nothing of
# the surface form before it; reconstructing the stem "a" therefore needs the whole word consumed,
# which only FULLSTRIP allows.
SFX F1 Y 1
SFX F1 a an .

# CIRCUMFIX: PFX P1 and SFX S1 both carry the circumfix flag C1 as a continuation, so neither may
# apply on its own — only together, on a stem carrying both P1 and S1 directly.
PFX P1 Y 1
PFX P1 0 pre/C1 .

SFX S1 Y 1
SFX S1 0 fix/C1 .
